New York, session 2025-2026, S7101.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3229 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3229. Public holidays. A city school district of a city with a popu- 4 lation of one million or more shall refer to all public holidays, 5 including but not limited to Columbus Day, by the designated name pursu- 6 ant to section twenty-four of the general construction law. Any litera- 7 ture or document created and/or distributed by such city school district 8 shall refer to such holidays in such manner, including but not limited 9 to school calendars. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11407-01-5